src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_UN_STEM_2_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - ta kún - ENGLISH : # CLASS_UN_STEM_2

     ta kún+V+Interr+Past: ta kwáanaa
     ta kún+V+Indir+Past: ta kwáanaan
     ta kún+V+Rel+Evid: ta kwáanaas
     ta kún+V+Past+NonFact: ta kwáanaa.ang
     ta kún+V+Cert+Pres: ta kwáanʼahlanggang
     ta kún+V+Cert+Past: ta kwáanʼahlanggan
     ta kún+V+Cert+Past+Hab: ta kwáanʼahlanggiinii
     ta kún+V+Cert+Rel: ta kwáanʼahlans
     ta kún+V+Ints+Past: ta kwáanaaʼahlang
     ta kún+V+Cont: ta kwáanaaʼahlanggaa
     ta kún+V+Ctfact+Pres: ta kwáanaaʼahlanggang
     ta kún+V+Rflx: ta kwáanʼahl
